Utah statutes.
78A-7-202.   Justice court judges to be appointed -- Procedure -- Retention.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Local government executive" means:
(i)  for a county:
(A)  the chair of the county commission in a county operating under the county
commission or expanded county commission form of county government;
(B)  the county executive in a county operating under the county executive-
council form of county government; and
(C)  the county manager in a county operating under the council-manager form
of county government; and
(ii)  for a city or town:
(A)  the mayor of the city or town; or
(B)  the city manager, in the council-manager form of government described in
Subsection 10-3b-103(6).
(b)  "Local legislative body" means:
(i)  for a county, the county commission or county council; and
(ii)  for a city or town, the council of the city or town.
(2)  There is created in each county a county justice court nominating
commission to review applicants and make recommendations to the appointing
authority for a justice court position.  The commission shall be convened when
a new justice court judge position is created or when a vacancy in an existing
court occurs for a justice court located within the county.
(a)  Membership of the justice court nominating commission shall be as
follows:
(i)  one member appointed by:
(A)  the county commission if the county has a county commission form of
government; or
(B)  the county executive if the county has an executive-council form of
government;
(ii)  one member appointed by the municipalities in the counties as follows:
(A)  if the county has only one municipality, appointment shall be made by the
governing authority of that municipality; or
(B)  if the county has more than one municipality, appointment shall be made
by a municipal selection committee composed of the mayors of each municipality
in the county;
(iii)  one member appointed by the county bar association; and
(iv)  two members appointed by the governing authority of the jurisdiction
where the judicial office is located.
(b)  If there is no county bar association, the member in Subsection
(2)(a)(iii) shall be appointed by the regional bar association.  If no
regional bar association exists, the state bar association shall make the
appointment.
(c)  Members appointed under Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (ii) may not be an
elected official of the county or municipality.
(d)  The nominating commission shall submit at least two names to the
appointing authority of the jurisdiction expected to be served by the judge.
The local government executive shall appoint a judge from the list submitted
and the appointment ratified by the local legislative body.
(e)  The state court administrator shall provide staff to the commission.  The
Judicial Council shall establish rules and procedures for the conduct of the
commission.
(3)  Judicial vacancies shall be advertised in a newspaper of general
circulation, through the Utah State Bar, and other appropriate means.
(4)  Selection of candidates shall be based on compliance with the
requirements for office and competence to serve as a judge.
(5)  Once selected, the Judicial Council shall certify the judge as qualified
to hold office upon successful completion of the orientation program.
(6)  The selection of a person to fill the office of justice court judge is
effective upon certification of the judge by the Judicial Council.  A justice
court judge may not perform judicial duties until certified by the Judicial
Council.
(7)  Upon the expiration of a justice court judge's term of office, the judge
shall be subject to an unopposed retention election in the county or counties
in which the court to which the judge is appointed is located, in accordance
with the procedures set forth in Section 20A-12-201.
(8)  Before each retention election, each justice court judge shall be
evaluated in accordance with the performance evaluation program established in
Subsection 78A-2-104(5).
